Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3916
Application for counsel; inquiry by court or magistrate; waiver of counsel.

Any person described in section 29-3915 or any other person entitled by law to representation by counsel may at any time request the court in which the matter is pending or the court in which the person was convicted to appoint the public defender to provide representation. Upon a request for the appointment of counsel, the court or magistrate shall proceed to make appropriate inquiry into the financial circumstances of the applicant who shall submit, unless waived in whole or in part by the court, a financial statement under oath or affirmation setting forth his or her assets and liabilities, source or sources of income, and such other information as may be required by the court or magistrate. The information contained in such a statement shall be confidential and for the exclusive use of the court or magistrate unless it is made to appear to the satisfaction of the court or magistrate that the statement may contain false, misleading, or incomplete information, in which event the person making the statement shall be punished as for contempt if it is established after a hearing that the statement was in whole or in part false, misleading, or incomplete. A refusal to execute a financial statement as provided in this section shall constitute a waiver of the right to the appointment of the public defender.

Laws 1969, c. 234, § 8, p. 865;

R.S.1943, (1989), § 29-1805.08;

Laws 1990, LB 822, § 34.